Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.112

Online access to health care resources—Annual accounting of use of funds and use of online resources—University of Washington.

Within the amounts transferred from the department of health under RCW 43.70.110(3), the University of Washington shall, through the health sciences library, provide online access to selected vital clinical resources, medical journals, decision support tools, and evidence-based reviews of procedures, drugs, and devices to the health professionals listed in RCW 43.70.110(3)(c). Online access shall be available no later than January 1, 2009. Each year, by December 1st, the University of Washington shall provide an annual accounting of the use of the funds transferred, including which categories of health professionals are using the materials available under the program. The accounting must be transmitted by electronic mail to the members of the health care committees of the legislature.

[ 2009 c 558 s 2; 2007 c 259 s 12.]

NOTES:

Subheadings not law—2007 c 259: See note following RCW 7.70.060.